Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.350

Medical, health and hospital service—Authorized.

The board of regents of Washington State University is hereby granted authority to enter into such contracts, leases, or agreements as may be necessary to provide adequate medical, health, and hospital service for students of Washington State University and the people of the surrounding community and to provide adequate practice facilities for students enrolled in nursing courses.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.30.350. Prior: 1947 c 95 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4603-20. Formerly RCW 28.80.250.]